Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5207
Recruitment and training of physicians for rural communities; program established; purpose.

There is hereby created a program for the recruitment and training of physicians for rural communities, which shall be included as a program in the general budget of the University of Nebraska Medical Center. The purpose of such program shall be to coordinate, train, and recruit physicians to meet the medical service needs of rural communities.

Laws 1975, LB 571, § 7.